Maryland, session 2025, SB1030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 22–218(c)(4) through (13) of Article – Transportation of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 22–218(c)(5) through (14), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
22–218.
(c) (1) A person may not drive or move on any highway any vehicle or
equipment that is equipped with or displays any light or signal device designed to emit an
oscillating, rotating, blinking, or other type of emission of light, unless designated and
– 1 –

Ch. 562 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
authorized by the Administrator as indicated in paragraphs (2) through [(13)] (14) of this
subsection. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the display and use of any lighting
device that may be permitted or required elsewhere in the Maryland Vehicle Law.
(4) IN EACH NONPROFIT VOLUNTEER EMERGENCY MEDICAL
ORGANIZATION THAT IS LOCATED IN BALTIMORE COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY AND
OPERATES UNDER A COMMERCIAL AMBULANCE SERVICE LICENSE UNDER THE
COMMERCIAL AMBULANCE SERVICE LICENSE HELD BY HATZALAH OF BALTIMORE,
NO MORE THAN FIVE OF THE HIGHEST–RANKING OFFICERS MAY HAVE THEIR
PRIVATELY OWNED VEHICLES EQUIPPED WITH RED OR RED AND WHITE LIGHTS OR
SIGNAL DEVICES WHICH MAY BE DISPLAYED ONLY WHILE ON ROUTE TO OR AT THE
SCENE OF AN EMERGENCY.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –